Massachusetts, session 194th, S643.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 321 of Chapter 94 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after the definition of “Rigid plastic container”, the following
new definition:-
“Recyclable beverage container”, any beverage container which is composed of a highly
recyclable material, including but not limited to aluminum and polyethylene terephthalate, and so
constructed and designed that it is capable of being recycled into a new beverage container no
less than five times and can be collected through municipal and private collection systems or
statewide deposit return systems; recyclable beverage containers shall not be defined as “single-
use”.
of 1